Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-9,139
Sections; prospective application.

The provisions of sections 85-9,133 to 85-9,139 shall have prospective application only and shall apply to any violation occurring after June 1, 1992.

Laws 1991, LB 69, § 7.